Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-132
County board; duties.

The county board of each county shall be the overseer of the poor and shall be vested with the superintendence of the poor in such county. It shall be the duty of the county board to provide general assistance to all poor persons (1) who meet the requirements contained in section 68-131 and who are eligible for general assistance pursuant to standards established by the county board as required by section 68-133 or (2) who are eligible for and participate in a program established pursuant to section 68-152. Such general assistance shall be in amounts established by the county board as required by section 68-133 and shall be adequate to insure maintenance of minimum health and decency.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 6.